Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1104
Appeal; procedure.

Any party objecting to such allowance may, within thirty days from the entering of the award, appeal to the district court of the county in which such lands are situated by entering into an undertaking to the State of Nebraska, to be approved by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds or governing body, in such sum as the board shall specify, conditioned (1) that the appellant shall prosecute such appeal to effect without unnecessary delay; and (2) that if judgment be rendered against such appellant, he will satisfy such judgment. Within ten days from the filing of such bond, the board or governing body shall make a certified transcript of such proceedings with the board or governing body and transmit the same to the district court of the county in which such lands are situated, where the same shall be heard before the court as a proceeding in equity.

Laws 1963, c. 323, § 4, p. 981.